Washington statutes.
RCW 33.16.040

Removal of director, officer or employee on objection of director of financial institutions—Procedure.

If the director shall notify the board of directors of any association in writing, that he or she has information that any director, officer, or employee of such association is dishonest, reckless, or incompetent or is failing to perform any duty of his or her office, the board shall meet and consider such matter forthwith and the director shall have notice of the time and place of such meeting. If the board shall find the director's objection to be well-founded, such director, officer, or employee shall be removed immediately. If the board does not remove the director, officer, or employee against whom the objections have been filed, or if the board fails to meet, consider or act upon the objections within twenty days after receiving the same, the director may forthwith or within twenty days thereafter, remove such individual by complying with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. If the director feels that the public interest or safety of the association requires the immediate removal of such individual, the director may petition the superior court for a temporary injunction suspending the performance of the individual as a director pending the administrative procedure hearing.

[ 1994 c 92 s 439; 1982 c 3 s 30; 1973 c 130 s 21; 1945 c 235 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-136. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.

Appointment of provisional officers and directors: RCW 33.40.150.